incubator/apertium-en-la.la.dix
    <pardef n="ar/x__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cis</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cem</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cum</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cibus</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cibus</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cibus</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="re/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bus</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ag/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rorum</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ros</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bell/um__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="arx"><i>ar</i><par n="ar/x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="res"><i>re</i><par n="re/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ager"><i>ag</i><par n="ag/er__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aedificium"><i>aedifici</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ambulatorium"><i>ambulatori</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="antidotum"><i>antidot</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="argentum"><i>argent</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="armamentum"><i>armament</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="articulum"><i>articul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="auditorium"><i>auditori</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="auspicium"><i>auspici</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="bacillum"><i>bacill</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="beneficium"><i>benefici</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="caelum"><i>cael</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="capillamentum"><i>capillament</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cenaculum"><i>cenacul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="coelum"><i>coel</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="compendium"><i>compendi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="consortium"><i>consorti</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="decretum"><i>decret</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="donum"><i>don</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="evangelium"><i>evangeli</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="exilium"><i>exili</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="factum"><i>fact</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="firmamentum"><i>firmament</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="fundamentum"><i>fundament</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gremium"><i>gremi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hortamentum"><i>hortament</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="incendium"><i>incendi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="initium"><i>initi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="iudicium"><i>iudici</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="iusiurandum"><i>iusiurand</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="librum"><i>libr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="luculentum"><i>luculent</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mancipium"><i>mancipi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="membrum"><i>membr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="miraculum"><i>miracul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="monstrum"><i>monstr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="negotium"><i>negoti</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="officium"><i>offici</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="oraculum"><i>oracul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="otium"><i>oti</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="paululum"><i>paulul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praemium"><i>praemi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="pretium"><i>preti</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="propheticum"><i>prophetic</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="receptaculum"><i>receptacul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="remedium"><i>remedi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sacrificium"><i>sacrifici</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="saxum"><i>sax</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sepulchrum"><i>sepulchr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="simulacrum"><i>simulacr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="somnum"><i>somn</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="stipendium"><i>stipendi</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tabernaculum"><i>tabernacul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="temerarium"><i>temerari</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tergum"><i>terg</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="theatrum"><i>theatr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="utrum"><i>utr</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vaticinium"><i>vaticini</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="verum"><i>ver</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vinculum"><i>vincul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vocabulum"><i>vocabul</i><par n="bell/um__n"/></e>
